Illinois, session 104th, HB901.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Government Electronic Records Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 35/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Government Electronic Records Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-1363, eff. 7-28-10.)